Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-128
Contracting owner; presumption of agency.

For the purpose of determining whether an owner is a contracting owner, agency is presumed, in the absence of clear and convincing evidence to the contrary, between employer and employee, between spouses, between joint tenants, and among tenants in common.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 4.